Georgia, session 2025_26, HB333.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 20-2-212 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to salary
schedules for professionals in elementary and secondary education, is amended by revising
subsection (c) and by adding a new subsection to read as follows:
"(c) A local unit of administration shall pay beginning classroom teachers the first salary
payment for the number of days worked at the end of the first month of the school year in
which service is rendered.
(d) The State Board of Education shall develop rules and procedures for implementing this
subsection by July 1, 2001 2025. Such rules and procedures shall provide for, at a
minimum, the following:
H. B. 333
- 1 -

LC 49 2162
(1) That the minimum salary schedule required by this Code section shall be updated
each year by December 1; and
(2) That each update provided for in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall reflect the
effect of annual inflation or deflation for the immediately preceding calendar year in
accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the State Board of Education, which
rules and regulations may use for this purpose the Consumer Price Index as reported by
the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor or any other
similar index established by the federal government, if the State Board of Education
determines that such federal index reflects the effect of inflation and deflation on
certificated professional personnel."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 333
- 2 -